District of Columbia statutes.
1-1304

Duties of Assistant Surveyor.

The Assistant Surveyor shall take the same oath his principal is required to take, and may, during the continuance of his office, discharge and perform any of the official duties of his principal.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1426, ch. 854, § 1592
June 28, 1935, 49 Stat. 431, ch. 332, § 3
1981 Ed., § 1-904.
1973 Ed., § 1-604.